Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-119] University of Hawaii;
net-zero energy goal. (a) The University of Hawaii shall establish a
collective goal of becoming net-zero with respect to energy use, producing as
much energy as the system consumes across all campuses, by January 1, 2035.

(b) The University of Hawaii shall establish a
benchmark for the amount and value of energy consumed during the 2014-2015
fiscal year, against which it shall measure its progress toward the net-zero
energy goal set forth in subsection (a).

(c) The University of Hawaii shall make
improvements that advance the net-zero energy goal set forth in subsection (a)
a priority.

(d) The University of Hawaii shall submit an
annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days before the convening
of each regular session. The annual report shall include the following
information:

(1) Overall progress toward the net-zero energy goal
set forth in subsection (a);

(2) Plans and recommendations to advance the net-zero
energy goal set forth in subsection (a). [L 2015, c 99, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next